Illinois, session 104th, SB1534.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1192 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)7    Sec. 5-1192. Prohibiting the use of natural gas in new 8construction. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 9county may not adopt any regulation that prohibits or has the 10effect of prohibiting the use of natural gas in new 11construction without a referendum. A home rule county may not 12regulate natural gas in a manner inconsistent with this 13Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of 14Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the 15concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and functions 16exercised by the State. 17    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 18adding Section 11-30-11 as follows: 19    (65 ILCS 5/11-30-11 new)20    Sec. 11-30-11. Prohibiting the use of natural gas in new 21construction. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a   SB1534- 2 -LRB104 11967 RTM 22061 b1municipality may not adopt any regulation that prohibits or 2has the effect of prohibiting the use of natural gas in new 3construction without a referendum. A home rule municipality 4may not regulate natural gas in a manner inconsistent with 5this Section. This Section is a limitation under subsection 6(i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on 7the concurrent exercise by home rule units of powers and 8functions exercised by the State.